Hawaii statutes.
§286-58 Appeal from finance director's
decision. Whenever any person is aggrieved by any decision of any county
director of finance under this part, the person may appeal from the decision of
the director of finance to the district court of the circuit in which the
county is situated, by filing with the court, within twenty days after the
decision, or within such additional time as may have been consented to in
writing by the director of finance, an informal notice of appeal setting forth
the name of the appellant, the circumstances attending the decision, a general
statement as to the ruling appealed from, the date of the decision, and a
description of the motor vehicle involved, with the serial or motor number or
both, if available. A copy of the notice shall be served upon, or mailed,
postage prepaid, by registered mail with request for return receipt, to the
director of finance within two days after the date of the filing with the
court. Informalities in the notice shall not invalidate the notice, and the
notice may be amended for good cause shown to the satisfaction of the court. [L
1951, c 237, §1; RL 1955, §160-16; HRS §286-58; am L 1970, c 188, §40]

Revision Note

"Director of finance" substituted for
"treasurer" to conform to county charters.

Cross References

Notice by certified mail, see §1-28.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next